apertium-mas.mas.twol
Alphabet
 A Ä Á B C D E Ẽ É G H I Í Ĩ J K L M O Ō Ö Ó P R S T U Ū Ú W Y Z
 a ä á b c d e ẽ é g h i í ĩ j k l m o ō ö ó p r s t u ū ú w y z
%{a%}:a %{a%}:0 %>:0
%{A%}:a %{A%}:e %{A%}:i %{A%}:o %{A%}:u
%{E%}:e %{E%}:a %{E%}:i %{E%}:o %{E%}:u
%{0%}:0 %{0%}:a %{0%}:e %{0%}:i %{0%}:o %{0%}:u
%{k%}:k %{k%}:0 
%{L%}:l %{L%}:0 
%{n%}:n %{n%}:m %{n%}:0 
%{K%}:0 %{K%}:k
%{e%}:e %{e%}:i
%{O%}:o %{O%}:0
%{i%}:i %{i%}:0
%{ʼ%}:ʼ %{ʼ%}:0
;

Sets

Vowel = A Ä Á E Ẽ É I Í Ĩ O Ō Ö Ó U Ū Ú
        a ä á e ẽ é i í ĩ o ō ö ó u ū ú ;
C = B C D G H J K L M P R S T R W Y Z 
    b c d g h j k l m p r s t r w y z ;

Rules

"Vowel is realized as same vowel two places before itself (in root, for present-p2pl)"
%{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx (:C) %>: _ ;
      where Vx in ( a e i o u )
            Vy in ( a e i o u )
      matched ;

"Vowel is realized as same vowel two or three after itself (in root, for past)"
%{E%}:Vy <=> _ %>: (:C) :C :Vx ;
      where Vx in ( a e i o u )
            Vy in ( a e i o u )
      matched ;

"If there is a consonant after the vowel in mention, realize vowel as same vowel one or two after the consonant"
%{0%}:Vy <=> _ %>: (:C) :C :Vx ;
      where Vx in ( a e i o u )
            Vy in ( a e i o u )
      matched ;

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Remove l when the noun root begins with l, r, s, or y (for now restricted to m prefixes)"
%{L%}:0 <=> [ o | i ] _ %>: [ l | r | s | y ] ; 

"Keep k when the noun begins with an a or o(fem prefix)"
%{K%}:k <=> [ e | i ] %{n%}: _ %>: [ a | o ] ; 

"Remove n when the noun root begins with l, r, s, y, m, n, u, or w (it's a lot, but it's specifically what the grammar book says) (for now restricted to f prefixes)"
%{n%}:0 <=> [ e | i ] _ %>: [ l | r | s | y | m | n | u | w ] ; 

"n changes to m when the noun root begins with p or b (bilabials woo!) (for f prefixes, but made it more general bc seems common)"
%{n%}:m <=> _ :0 %>: [ p | b ] ; 

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
